Utah statutes.
7-2-10.   Inventory of assets -- Listings of claims -- Report of proceedings
-- Filing -- Inspection.
As soon as is practical after taking possession of an institution the
commissioner, or any receiver or liquidator appointed by him, shall make or
cause to be made in duplicate an inventory of its assets, one copy to be filed
in his office and one with the clerk of the district court.  Upon the
expiration of the time fixed for presentation of claims the commissioner, or
any receiver or liquidator appointed by him, shall make in duplicate a full
and complete list of the claims presented, including and specifying claims
disallowed by him, of which one copy shall be filed in his office and one copy
in the office of the clerk of the district court.  The commissioner, or any
receiver or liquidator appointed by him, shall in like manner make and file
supplemental lists showing all claims presented after the filing of the first
list.  The supplemental lists shall be filed every six months and at least 15
days before the declaration of any dividend.  At the time of the order for
final distribution the commissioner, or any receiver or liquidator appointed
by him, shall make a report in duplicate of the proceeding, showing the
disposition of the assets and liabilities of the institution, one copy to be
filed in his office and one with the clerk of the district court.  The
accounting, inventory, and lists of claims shall be open at all reasonable
times for inspection.  Any objection to any report or accounting shall be
filed with the clerk of the district court within 30 days after the report of
accounting has been filed by the commissioner, or any receiver or liquidator
appointed by him, and shall be subject to judicial review only as provided in
Section 7-2-9.
